Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1068.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 10001 of Title 62, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Except as provided by subsection B of this section, no state
governmental entity or public trust having the state as its
beneficiary may enter into any agreement with a person, partnership,
limited partnership, limited liability partnership, corporation,
limited liability company, trust or other legal entity that would
prohibit the state governmental entity from making disclosure of the
terms of any agreement with such entity to make payment to or confer
value upon the entity using an incentive, tax credit, direct or

Req. No. 10539 Page 1

indi rect payment, grant, or similar benefit offered to such entity
if the benefit is provided through the use of state taxes.
B. The provisions of subsection A of this section shall not
require a state governmental entity or a public trust having the
state as its beneficiary to disclose information of a proprietary
nature with respect to a for-profit business entity if such
information has been provided to the state governmental entity or
public trust by or on behalf of the for-profit business entity, such
as trade secrets, the cost of inputs used or consumed by the
business entity, the labor costs of the for-profit business entity,
or information related to profit margins on goods or services sold
by the for-profit business entity.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10539 MAH 12/23/24









Req. No. 10539 Page 2